Illinois, session 104th, SB3611.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Power of Attorney Act is amended 5by changing Section 2-10 as follows: 6    (755 ILCS 45/2-10)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 802-10)7    Sec. 2-10. Agency-court relationship. 8    (a) Upon petition by any interested person, notice to the 9agent, principal, and interested persons as the court directs 10and a finding by the court that the principal lacks either the 11capacity to control or the capacity to revoke the agency, the 12court may construe a power of attorney, review the agent's 13conduct, and grant appropriate relief including compensatory 14damages.15    (b) If the court finds that the agent is not acting for the 16benefit of the principal in accordance with the terms of the 17agency or that the agent's action or inaction, including 18restricting or not allowing an interested person to have 19reasonable visitation with the principal, has caused or 20threatens substantial harm to the principal's person or 21property in a manner not authorized or intended by the 22principal, the court may order a guardian of the principal's 23person or estate to exercise any powers of the principal under   SB3611- 2 -LRB104 18247 JRC 31686 b1the agency, including the power to revoke the agency, or may 2enter such other orders without appointment of a guardian as 3the court deems necessary to provide for the best interests of 4the principal. 5    (c) If the court finds that the agency requires 6interpretation, the court may construe the agency and instruct 7the agent, but the court may not amend the agency.8    (d) If the court finds that the agent has not acted for the 9benefit of the principal in accordance with the terms of the 10agency and the Illinois Power of Attorney Act, or that the 11agent's action caused or threatened substantial harm to the 12principal's person or property in a manner not authorized or 13intended by the principal, then the agent shall not be 14authorized to pay or be reimbursed from the estate of the 15principal the attorneys' fees and costs of the agent in 16defending a proceeding brought pursuant to this Section.17    (e) Upon a finding that the agent's action has caused 18substantial harm to the principal's person or property, the 19court may assess against the agent reasonable costs and 20attorney's fees to a prevailing party who is a provider agency 21as defined in Section 2 of the Adult Protective Services Act, a 22representative of the Office of the State Long Term Care 23Ombudsman, the State Guardian, a public guardian, or a 24governmental agency having regulatory authority to protect the 25welfare of the principal.26    (f) As used in this Section, the term "interested person"   SB3611- 3 -LRB104 18247 JRC 31686 b1includes (1) the principal or the agent; (2) a guardian of the 2person, guardian of the estate, or other fiduciary charged 3with management of the principal's property; (3) the 4principal's spouse, parent, or descendant; (4) a person who 5would be a presumptive heir-at-law of the principal; (5) a 6person named as a beneficiary to receive any property, 7benefit, or contractual right upon the principal's death, or 8as a beneficiary of a trust created by or for the principal; 9(6) a provider agency as defined in Section 2 of the Adult 10Protective Services Act, a representative of the Office of the 11State Long Term Care Ombudsman, the State Guardian, a public 12guardian, or a governmental agency having regulatory authority 13to protect the welfare of the principal; and (7) the 14principal's caregiver or another person who demonstrates 15sufficient interest in the principal's welfare. 16    (g) Absent court order directing a guardian to exercise 17powers of the principal under the agency, a guardian will have 18no power, duty or liability with respect to any property 19subject to the agency or any personal or health care matters 20covered by the agency. If an agent seeks guardianship of the 21principal pursuant to the Probate Act of 1975, the petition 22for guardianship must delineate the specific powers to be 23granted to the guardian that are not already included in the 24power of attorney. The petition for temporary, limited, or 25plenary guardianship of the principal under the Probate Act of 261975 may include a prayer for relief to suspend a power of   SB3611- 4 -LRB104 18247 JRC 31686 b1attorney or to revoke a power of attorney in accordance with 2subsection (b). 3    (g-1) Any powers of attorney not otherwise invalidated or 4revoked in accordance with this Section are suspended upon the 5appointment of the Office of State Guardian or public guardian 6as a temporary, limited, or plenary guardian of the principal. 7Upon such an appointment, the court may revoke a power of 8attorney only if the named agent or successor agent under the 9power of attorney received notice of a petition for 10guardianship of the principal in accordance with Section 11a-4 11or Section 11a-8 of the Probate Act of 1975, and that agent 12failed to assert authority as agent before appointment of the 13Office of State Guardian or public guardian. If an agent or 14successor agent under a power of attorney does not receive 15notice of the petition for guardianship of the principal or an 16individual does not know about being named as an agent or 17successor agent under a power of attorney for the principal, 18that agent, successor agent, or individual may petition the 19court presiding over the guardianship of the principal to lift 20the suspension of the agency upon a showing by clear and 21convincing evidence that it is in the principal's best 22interests to reinstate the agency so that the agent, successor 23agent, or individual may act in accordance with the terms of 24the agency. Notice of a petition to lift the suspension of the 25agency and a copy of the petition shall be given to the 26guardian, the person with a disability, and to those persons   SB3611- 5 -LRB104 18247 JRC 31686 b1whose names and addresses are listed in the petition for 2guardianship under Section 11a-8 of the Probate Act of 1975, 3and any guardian ad litem not less than 14 days before the 4hearing. 5    (h) Proceedings under this Section shall be commenced in 6the county where the guardian was appointed or, if no Illinois 7guardian is acting, then in the county where the agent or 8principal resides or where the principal owns real property.9    (i) This Section shall not be construed to limit any other 10remedies available. 11(Source: P.A. 102-72, eff. 1-1-22; 103-55, eff. 1-1-24.) 12    Section 10. The Probate Act of 1975 is amended by changing 13Section 11a-8 as follows: 14    (755 ILCS 5/11a-8)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-8)15    Sec. 11a-8. Petition. The petition for adjudication of 16disability and for the appointment of a guardian of the estate 17or the person or both of an alleged person with a disability 18must state, if known or reasonably ascertainable: (a) the 19relationship and interest of the petitioner to the respondent; 20(b) the name, date of birth, and place of residence of the 21respondent; (c) the reasons for the guardianship; (d) the name 22and post office address of the respondent's guardian, if any, 23(d-1) the name and address or of the respondent's agent or 24agents appointed under the Illinois Power of Attorney Act, if   SB3611- 6 -LRB104 18247 JRC 31686 b1any, and, if no agent is identified or address provided, that 2diligent inquiry was made to learn this information and the 3specific steps taken; (e) the name and post office addresses 4of the nearest relatives of the respondent in the following 5order: (1) the spouse and adult children, parents and adult 6brothers and sisters, if any; if none, (2) nearest adult 7kindred known to the petitioner; (f) the name and address of 8the person with whom or the facility in which the respondent is 9residing; (g) the approximate value of the personal and real 10estate; (h) the amount of the anticipated annual gross income 11and other receipts; (i) the name, post office address and in 12case of an individual, the age, relationship to the respondent 13and occupation of the proposed guardian. In addition, if the 14petition seeks the appointment of a previously appointed 15standby guardian as guardian of the person with a disability, 16the petition must also state: (j) the facts concerning the 17standby guardian's previous appointment and (k) the date of 18death of the guardian of the person with a disability or the 19facts concerning the consent of the guardian of the person 20with a disability to the appointment of the standby guardian 21as guardian, or the willingness and ability of the guardian of 22the person with a disability to make and carry out day-to-day 23care decisions concerning the person with a disability. A 24petition for adjudication of disability and the appointment of 25a guardian of the estate or the person or both of an alleged 26person with a disability may not be dismissed or withdrawn   SB3611- 7 -LRB104 18247 JRC 31686 b1without leave of the court. A petitioner who seeks to revoke or 2construe a power of attorney for the alleged person with a 3disability, or review the agent's conduct, shall do so in 4conformity with the Illinois Power of Attorney Act, and as set 5forth in subsection (c) of Section 11a-17 and subsection (e) 6of Section 11a-18 of this Act. 7(Source: P.A. 102-72, eff. 1-1-22.)